Utah statutes.
19-6-1002.   Definitions.

(1)  "Board" means the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board created in Section 19-1-106.

(2)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste, created in Subsection 19-1-105(1)(e).

(4)  "Manufacturer" means the last person in the production or assembly process of a vehicle.

(5)  "Mercury switch" means a mercury-containing capsule that is part of a convenience light switch assembly installed in a vehicle's hood or trunk.

(6)  "Person" means an individual, a firm, an association, a partnership, a corporation, the state, or a local government.

(7)  "Plan" means a plan for removing and collecting mercury switches from vehicles.

(8)  "Vehicle" means any passenger automobile or car, station wagon, truck, van, or sport utility vehicle that may contain one or more mercury switches.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

